District of Columbia statutes.
2-302.02

Repealed

Procurement regulations and information system.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 202, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(g), 44 DCR 1423
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 130(b), 52 DCR 10637
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1182.2.
Delegation of Authority Under D.C. Law 6-85, the “D.C. Procurement Practices Act of 1985”, see Mayor’s Order 2002-207, December 27, 2002 ( 49 DCR 11867).